Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF287.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2039YH (2) 91 ss/ns H.F. 287 Section 1. Section 1C.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 1 following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 7A. Election Day, the first Tuesday after 3 the first Monday in November of each even-numbered year. 4 Sec. 2. Section 1C.2, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended by 5 adding the following new paragraph: 6 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0f. Election Day, the first Tuesday after 7 the first Monday in November of each even-numbered year. 8